Utah statutes.
57-25-108.   Recording.

(1) (a)  An environmental covenant and any amendment or termination of the covenant must be recorded in every county in which any portion of the real property subject to the covenant is located.

(b)  For purposes of indexing, a holder shall be treated as a grantee.

(2)  Except as otherwise provided in Subsection 57-25-109(3), an environmental covenant is subject to Utah laws governing recording and priority of interests in real property.



Enacted by Chapter 51, 2006 General Session

